nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Boksing og kampsport: Beskyttelsesutstyr for boksing og kampsport; Treningsutstyr for boksing og kampsport; Deler til bokseringer; Bokseringer; Kampsportbelter; Kampsportvåpen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бокс и бойни изкуства: Защитна екипировка за бокс и бойни изкуства; Оборудване за тренировки по бокс и бойни изкуства; Части за боксов ринг; Боксови рингове; Колани за бойни изкуства; Оръжия за бойни изкуства
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Boksen en vechtsporten: Beschermende uitrusting voor boksen; Benodigdheden voor boks- en vechtsporttraining; Onderdelen voor boksringen; Boksringen; Martial arts-banden; Martial arts-wapens
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бокс и единоборства: Защитная экипировка для бокса и единоборств; Тренировочный инвентарь для бокса и единоборств; Элементы боксерского ринга; Боксерские ринги; Пояса для единоборств; Оружие для единоборств
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Box a bojové umenia: Ochranné vybavenie na box a bojové umenia; Tréningové vybavenie na box a bojové umenia; Časti boxerského ringu; Boxerský ring; Opasky bojových umení; Zbrane bojových umení
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Πυγμαχία & πολεμικές τέχνες: Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός πυγμαχίας & πολεμικών τεχνών; Εξοπλισμός προπόνησης πυγμαχίας & πολεμικών τεχνών; Εξαρτήματα ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Ρινγκ πυγμαχίας; Ζώνες πολεμικών τεχνών; Όπλα πολεμικών τεχνών
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Boksz és harcművészetek: Boksz- és harcművészeti védőfelszerelés; Boksz- és harcművészeti edzőfelszerelések; Bokszgyűrűalkatrészek; Bokszgyűrűk; Harcművészeti övek; Harcművészeti fegyverek
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Nyrkkeily ja vapaaottelu: Nyrkkeily- ja vapaaottelusuojat; Nyrkkeilyn ja vapaaottelun harjoitteluvälineet; Nyrkkeilykehän osat; Nyrkkeilykehät; Kamppailulajien vyöt; Taistelulajien aseet
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Boxing & Martial Arts: Boxing & Martial Arts Protective Gear; Boxing & Martial Arts Training Equipment; Boxing Ring Parts; Boxing Rings; Martial Arts Belts; Martial Arts Weapons
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Box a bojové sporty: Ochranné pomůcky pro box a bojové sporty; Tréninkové vybavení na box a bojové sporty; Součásti boxerských ringů; Boxerské ringy; Pásy pro bojová umění; Zbraně pro bojová umění
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Box și arte marțiale: Echipament de protecție pentru box și arte marțiale; Echipament de antrenament pentru box și arte marțiale; Piese pentru ringul de box; Ringuri de box; Centuri pentru arte marțiale; Arme pentru arte marțiale
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Boxning och kampsporter: Skyddsutrustning för boxning och kampsport; Träningsutrustning för boxning och kampsporter; Delar till boxningsringar; Boxningsringar; Kampsportsbälten; Kampsportsvapen
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Boxe e artes marciais: Equipamentos de proteção para boxe e artes marciais; Equipamento de treinamento para boxe e artes marciais; Peças do ringue de boxe; Ringues de boxe; Faixas para artes marciais; Armas de artes marciais
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 拳擊與武術: 拳擊/武術防護裝備; 拳擊與武術訓練裝備; 拳擊台配件; 拳擊台; 武術腰帶; 武術武器
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Boxeo y artes marciales: Equipo de protección para boxeo y artes marciales; Equipamiento de entrenamiento para boxeo y artes marciales; Piezas para rings de boxeo; Rings de boxeo; Cinturones de artes marciales; Armas de artes marciales
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Boksas ir kovos menai: Bokso ir kovos menų apsauginė įranga; Bokso ir kovos menų treniruočių įranga; Bokso ringų dalys; Bokso ringai; Kovos menų diržai; Kovos menų ginklai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Boks i sztuki walki: Ochraniacze do boksu i sztuk walki; Trening bokserski i sztuk walki; Części ringów bokserskich; Ringi bokserskie; Pasy do sztuk walki; Broń do sztuk walki
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Boxe e artes marciais: Equipamento de proteção para boxe e artes marciais; Equipamento de treino para boxe e artes marciais; Peças para ringues de boxe; Ringues de boxe; Cintos para artes marciais; Armas para artes marciais
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấm bốc & Võ thuật: Thiết bị bảo vệ khi đấm bốc và thi đấu võ thuật; Thiết bị tập luyện đấm bốc & võ thuật; Phụ kiện võ đài môn đấm bốc; Võ đài đấm bốc; Đai võ thuật; Vũ khí võ thuật
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Boks i borilačke vještine: Zaštitna oprema za boks i borilačke vještine; Oprema za trening boksa i borilačkih vještina; Dijelovi boksačkog ringa; Boksački ringovi; Pojasevi za borilačke vještine; Oružje za borilačke vještine
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 권투/무술: 권투/무술 보호 장비; 권투/무술 훈련 장비; 권투 링 부품; 권투 링; 무술 띠; 무술용 무기
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Boksning og kampsport: Bokse- og kampsportsudstyr; Træningsudstyr til boksning og kampsport; Boksering – dele; Bokseringe; Kampsportsbælter; Våben til kampsport
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Boxe e arti marziali: Attrezzatura protettiva pugilato; Attrezzature per l'allenamento per boxe e arti marziali; Parti per ring pugilato; Ring per pugilato; Cinture per arti marziali; Armi per arti marziali
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > มวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้: อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับการชกมวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมสำหรับมวยและศิลปะการต่อสู้; ชิ้นส่วนเวทีมวย; เวทีมวย; เข็มขัดศิลปะการต่อสู้; อาวุธศิลปะการต่อสู้
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Boks in borilne veščine: Zaščitna oprema za boks in borilne veščine; Oprema za vadbo boksa in borilnih veščin; Deli za boksarski ring; Boksarski ringi; Pasovi za borilne veščine; Orodja za borilne veščine
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Boks ve Dövüş Sporları: Boks ve Dövüş Sanatları Koruyucu Giysileri; Boks ve Dövüş Sporları Eğitim Ekipmanları; Boks Ringi Parçaları; Boks Ringleri; Dövüş Sanatı Kuşakları; Dövüş Sanatı Silahları
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ボクシング・格闘技: ボクシング・格闘技用プロテクター; ボクシング・格闘技用練習器具; ボクシングリングパーツ; ボクシングリング; 格闘技・武術用帯; 武具
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Boxen & Kampfsport: Boxschutzbekleidung; Trainingsausrüstung für Boxen & Kampfsport; Boxringelemente; Boxringe; Kampfsportgürtel; Kampfsportwaffen
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 拳击/武术: 拳击/武术护具; 拳击/武术训练设备; 拳击台零部件; 拳击擂台; 武术腰带; 武术兵器
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Boxe et arts martiaux: Équipement de protection pour la boxe et les arts martiaux; Équipement d'entraînement à la boxe et aux arts martiaux; Pièces de ring de boxe; Rings de boxe; Ceintures d'arts martiaux; Armes d'arts martiaux